Mississippi, session 2026, HB1141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as "Trey's Law". SECTION 2.  The Legislature finds and declares all of the following: (a) Sexual abuse causes significant and lasting harm to individuals and society as a whole. (b) Sexual abuse survivors often experience long-term physical, psychological, and emotional trauma. (c) The State of Mississippi has a compelling interest in preventing sexual abuse, supporting victims, and ensuring that the law does not shield perpetrators or impede public safety. (d) Any agreement that prohibits an individual or entity from disclosing an act of sexual abuse or facts related to an act of sexual abuse is against the public policy of this state. (e) This act is intended to protect survivors' rights to speak freely and to maintain privacy and confidentiality regarding their identities, experiences, and trauma. SECTION 3.  (1)  (a)  For the purposes of this section, the term "sexual abuse" means any conduct that, if convicted, would require registration as a sex offender, or be considered a crime of sexual violence under state law, including human trafficking, regardless of whether the conduct has led to a criminal charge, conviction, adjudication, or sentence. (b) Any provision of a nondisclosure agreement, confidentiality agreement, employment agreement, settlement agreement, or any other type of agreement that prohibits an individual or entity from disclosing an act of sexual abuse or facts related to an act of sexual abuse to another individual or entity is void and unenforceable. (2) This subsection shall apply to any agreement entered into, executed, or amended on or after July 1, 2026, and shall apply solely to elements of an agreement related to the act of sexual abuse and shall not apply to other aspects of an agreement, including, but not limited to, compensation. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.